Idaho statutes. Title 15 UNIFORM PROBATE CODE
Part 10
Will Registry

§ 15-2-1001. Will registry.

The secretary of state shall create and maintain a will registry. The information contained in such registry shall include: the full name of the person making the will; the date the will was made; and sufficient identification of the location of the will at the time of registration. The method of registration shall be on a form required by the secretary of state. The fee for registration shall be ten dollars ($10.00) which shall be deposited by the secretary of state in the general fund. The secretary of state shall not be liable in any way for the accuracy of the information contained in the registry. The existence, or nonexistence, of a registration for a particular will shall not be considered as an evidentiary fact in any proceeding relating to such will. The failure to file information about a will in the registry shall not be a factor in the validity of the will, nor shall the failure to file be considered as malpractice on the part of any attorney as to the will. Only interested persons as defined in section 15-1-201, Idaho Code, or their attorneys may search the records contained herein. The secretary of state shall not be liable for the accuracy of the representation of the interested person or the interested person’s attorney.